apertium-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: CASES ;

!!!!!!!   I N T E R R O G A T I V E

! Some of the words listed in the grammars I have as interrogative pronouns
! were placed in other root lexicons depending on what POS they substitute or
! act like syntactically. So (as planned for today):
! 1) "ничә" is a <num><itg>;
! 2) "кая, кайда, кайдан, кайчан, ничек" are <adv><itg> (the first three
! should link to a class containing location cases btw, as many current adverbs
! do);
! 3) "қанша" is added both as an interrogative pronoun and as an interrogative
! adverb /IS/
!
! What already added as interrogative pronouns are: кім, ни, нәрсе
! And to be added as interrogative pronouns are: қайсы, қандай, қанша.
! I'd like to mark қандай as <sim> form (with қандай for the upper side though),
! but wouldn't go too deeply into the structure of other two and not derive them
! from "қай" (that's what they have most likely originated from) IS
!
! Of course, "қай", "қайсы" and all other pronouns which can be used as an
! attribute were added as determiners linking to CLIT as well.
! Good idea is to have an rlx rule selecting determiner reading when a word is
! ambiguous between (prn X nom) and (det X) and there is noun to the right;
! and selecting pronoun if there is a verb to the right.

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:кайсы CLITICS-NO-COP ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:кайсының CLITICS-NO-COP ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:кайсына CLITICS-NO-COP ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:кайсын CLITICS-NO-COP ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:кайсыннан CLITICS-NO-COP ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:кайсында CLITICS-NO-COP ;

кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>:кайсы GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-NINDI

! Might be not complete (қандайларығыз? and possessive stuff in general)

нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:нинди CLITICS-NO-COP ;
! ^ FIXME Similative form of demonstrative pronouns should receive an alternati-
! ve continuation with CLIT too. Consider e,g.: "Ең жақсы Интернет қандай?" Here
! it shouldn't receive <nom> tag I think /IS/
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:нинди CASES ;
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:ниндие%{n%} CASES ;
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:ниндиләр CASES ;
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:ниндиләрен%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON InterrogativePronouns

PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
PRON-ITG-NINDI ;
ни:ни PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
нимә:нимә PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "(dial.) what"
нәрсә:нәрсә PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
кем:кем PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"
күпме:күпме PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-QNT-POSS

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASES-ETC ;
%<adv%>:чә CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSS-REAL. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ; ! FIXME <px3sg>?
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!      DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

!==============================================================================!
!                         PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS
! Stems will continue with one of the following lexicons:
!==============================================================================!

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N1-RUS

:%{☭%} N1 ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сакчылары=пограничники)
                                                         !  FIXME CHECK: Is {s} needed here ?
%<n%>: POSSESSIVES ;                 ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
                                     ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis

LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>: POSSESSIVES ;
%<n%>: ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON

CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; ! FIXME:NOTE: this cont.class might lead to some overgeneration
                                        ! *Мәскәүдәй?
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NPCOGFLEX

! This isn't used at the moment,
! but e.g. ?Polish cognoms ending with -ска would take this cont.class /I.S./ 

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<dist%>:%>%{A%}р FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<dist%>:%>%{A%}р FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>: # ;
%<num%>%<coll%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG-COLL

%<num%>%<itg%>%<coll%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<coll%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

 LEXICON Numerals
бер:бер NUM ; ! ""
биш:биш NUM ; ! ""
унөч:унөч NUM ; ! ""
утыз:утыз NUM ; ! ""
ике% йөз:ике% йөз NUM ; ! "" Use/MT
мең:мең NUM ; ! "thousand"
өч:өчәү NUM-COLL ;
биш:бишәү NUM-COLL ;
тугыз:тугызау NUM-COLL ; ! ""
унөч:унөчәү NUM-COLL ; ! ""
унҗиде:унҗидәү NUM-COLL ; ! ""
утыз:утызау NUM-COLL ; ! ""
III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V NUM-ROMAN ;  ! ""
IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
ничә:ничә NUM-ITG ;
ничә:ничәү NUM-ITG-COLL ;
 LEXICON Nouns
Аллаһ:аллаһ N3 ; ! ""
Аллаһ:аллаһу N3 ; ! "" Dir/LR
Аллаһ:аллаһы N3 ; ! "" Dir/LR
Аллаһы% Тәгалә:аллаһу% тәгалә N3 ; ! "" Dir/LR
Аллаһы% Тәгалә:Аллаһы% Тәгалә N3 ; ! ""
бавырсак:бавырсак N1 ; ! ""
балта% остасы:балта% оста N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
биография:биография N1-RUS ; ! ""
Будда:будда N3 ; ! ""
веб:веб%{ъ%} N1 ; ! ""
власть% иясе:власть% ия N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
диссидент:диссидент%{ъ%} N1-RUS ; ! ""
әвен:әвен N1 ; ! ""
имчәк% баласы:имчәк% бала N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
ия:ия N1 ; ! ""
коллектив:коллектив%{ъ%} N1-RUS ; ! ""
кыр% кәҗәсе:кыр% кәҗә N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
метеор:метеор N1 ; ! ""
микроорганизм:микроорганизм%{ъ%} N1-RUS ; ! ""
реактор:реактор N1-RUS ; ! ""
терроризм:терроризм%{ъ%} N1-RUS ; ! ""
тәрәзә% капкачы:тәрәзә% капкач N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
тираж:тираж N1 ; ! ""
хәзерге% заман:хәзерге% заман N3 ; ! "" Use/MT
чыршы% үләне:чыршы% үлән N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
явым%-төшем:явым%-төшем N1 ; ! ""
билетный% солдат:билетный% солдат N1-RUS ; ! ""
бинаэн:бинаэн POST ; ! "" Use/MT
җәмигъ:җәмиг DET-QNT ; ! "" Dir/LR Use/MT
җәмигъ:җәмигъ DET-QNT ; ! ""
кадәрле:кадәрле POST ; ! "" Use/MT
саир:саир POST ; ! ""
соңра:соңра POST ; ! "" Use/MT
тәхте:тәхте POST ; ! ""
үзерә:үзерә POST ; ! "" Use/MT
күкрәк% рәнҗүе:күкрәк% рәнҗү N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Сочи:Сочи%{ъ%} NP-TOP ; ! ""
Дөбри:Дөбри NP-TOP ; ! ""
Караңгы% % Чокырча:Караңгы% % Чокырча NP-TOP ; ! ""
Маметьево% Пустошь:Маметьево% Пустошь NP-TOP ; ! ""
Сатышелга:Сатышелга NP-TOP ; ! ""
Урысбага:Урысбага NP-TOP ; !  ""
Ялтан:Ялтан NP-TOP ; ! ""
Габделхак:Габделхак NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Гөлсәрия:Гөлсәрия NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ислам:Ислам NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Ләззәт:Ләззәт NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Хафиз:Хафиз%{ъ%} NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Шырын:Шырын NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Гыйлемша:Гыйлемша NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Мирзаибраһим:Мирзаибраһим NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Тәмти:Тәмти NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Бибишәфига:Бибишәфига NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Миңнеҗәмилә:Миңнеҗәмилә NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Әшрәфҗамал:Әшрәфҗамал NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Җөзелкәй:Җөзелкәй NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Факиһәтелҗинан:Факиһәтелҗинан NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Әхмәтович:Әхмәто NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Вячеславович:Вячеславо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Заһитович:Заһито NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Макаревич:Макаре NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Потапович:Потапо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Фәизович:Фәизо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Достоевский:Достоевский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Карамзин:Карамзин NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Македонский:Македонский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Репин:Репин NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Чайковский:Чайковский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Арханский:Арханский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Кизкәнбашский:Кизкәнбашский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Гоголь:Гоголь NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Колесниченко:Колесниченко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Нобель:Нобель NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Фламенко:Фламенко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Халиди:Халиди NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
әл-Мәнгәри:әл-мәнгәри NP-COG-MF ; ! "" Use/MT
Брагин:Брагин NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Загаев:Загаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Ломов:Ломов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Пименов:Пименов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Төхватуллин:Төхватуллин NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Якимов:Якимов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Гардиан:Гардиан NP-ORG ; ! ""
Майкрософт:Майкрософт NP-ORG ; ! ""
Татар%-информ:Татар%-информ NP-ORG ; ! ""
Хьюман% Райтс% Уотч:Хьюман% Райтс% Уотч NP-ORG ; ! ""
Conoco:Conoco NP-ORG ; ! ""
Inc:Inc NP-ORG ; ! ""
Mobil:Mobil NP-AL ; ! ""
Witness:Witness NP-AL ; ! ""
Артемида:Артемида NP-AL ; ! ""
Время:Время NP-AL ; ! ""
Китаби%-ал%-масалик% Вал%-мамлик:Китаби%-ал%-масалик% Вал%-мамлик NP-AL ; ! "" Use/MT
Спартак:Спартак NP-AL ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
белорусча:белорусча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
грекча:грекча ADV-LANG ; ! "Greek"
испанча:испанча ADV-LANG ; ! "Spanish"
кыргызча:кыргызча ADV-LANG ; ! "Kyrgyz"
полякча:полякча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
урысча:урысча ADV-LANG ; ! "Russian"
якутча:якутча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
